Hawaii statutes.
[§321‑4.7] Producers
of hand-pounded poi; exemption. A producer of hand-pounded poi shall not
be required to process poi in a certified food-processing establishment or be
required to obtain a permit from the department of health, if the producer:

(1) Sells hand-pounded poi directly to consumers;

(2) Prepares hand-pounded poi adjacent to permanent
or temporary hand-washing facilities; and

(3) Complies with rules adopted by the department to
protect the health and safety of the public.

The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter
91 to effectuate this section no later than December 31, 2011. [L 2011, c 107, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next